Nevada, session 83, SB249.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 632.2397 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
632.2397 1. A certified registered nurse anesthetist may:
-
*SB249*

– 2 –
(a) Under the supervision of a physician licensed pursuant to
chapter 630 or 633 of NRS, order, prescribe, possess and administer
controlled substances, poisons, dangerous drugs and devices to treat
a patient under the care of a licensed physician [in a critical access
hospital] in preparation for surgery or childbirth, during surgery or
childbirth and while a patient recovers from surgery or childbirth.
(b) Possess and administer controlled substances, poisons,
dangerous drugs and devices in other circumstances under which a
registered nurse is authorized to possess and administer controlled
substances, poisons, dangerous drugs and devices.
2. A certified registered nurse anesthetist shall not order or
prescribe a controlled substance, poison, dangerous drug or device
except as authorized by paragraph (a) of subsection 1.
[3. As used in this section, “critical access hospital” means a
hospital which has been certified as a critical access hospital by the
Secretary of Health and Human Services pursuant to 42 U.S.C.
1395i-4(e).]
Sec. 2. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
H
-
*SB249*